North Carolina, session 2025, HB226.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described property, identified by Guilford County Tax
Property Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the City of Greensboro:
6895976475; 7806008817; 7806009684.
SECTION 2. This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City of
Greensboro for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Greensboro.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the territory
described in Section 1 of this act as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
*H226-v-4*